Illinois, session 104th, SB2946.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Radio Act is amended 5by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2615/10)7    Sec. 10. Public safety radio interoperability. 8    (a) In this Section, "interoperability" means the ability 9of emergency response providers and relevant government 10officials to communicate across jurisdictions, disciplines, 11and levels of government as needed and as authorized.12    (b) The Upon their establishment and thereafter, the 13Director of the Illinois State Police, or his or her designee, 14shall serve as the chairman of the Illinois Statewide 15Interoperability Executive Committee (SIEC). The SIEC shall 16oversee governance, interoperability, and land mobile radio 17standards for Illinois' land mobile radio communications 18system and shall collaborate with the Office of the Statewide 199-1-1 Administrator and the Office of the Statewide 20Interoperability Coordinator to strengthen Illinois' emergency 21communications ecosystem and as the chairman of the STARCOM21 22Oversight Committee. The SIEC may designate subcommittees 23necessary to effectuate its responsibilities under this   SB2946- 2 -LRB104 15203 RTM 28349 b1Section. The Director or his or her designee, as chairman, may 2increase the size and makeup of the voting membership of the 3SIEC each committee when deemed necessary for improved public 4safety radio interoperability, but the voting membership of 5each committee must represent public safety users (police, 6fire, or EMS) and must, at a minimum, include the Statewide 7Interoperability Coordinator, the Statewide 9-1-1 8Administrator, the Director of the Secretary of State Police 9or the Director's designee, and at least one representative 10from each of the following, appointed by the Governor: an 11association representing Illinois fire chiefs, an association 12representing Illinois fire protection districts, the Office of 13the State Fire Marshal, an association representing Illinois 14chiefs of police, an association representing Illinois 15sheriffs, the Illinois State Police, the Illinois Emergency 16Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, the 17Department of Public Health, the Department of Innovation and 18Technology, and the Department of Military Affairs 19representatives specified in this Section.20    Committee members The STARCOM21 Oversight Committee must 21comprise public safety users accessing the system and shall 22include the Statewide Interoperability Coordinator. The 23members of the STARCOM21 Oversight Committee shall serve 24without compensation and may, at the call of the Chair, meet in 25person or remotely. The SIEC shall adopt bylaws for its 26effective operation, as well as that of its subcommittees, and   SB2946- 3 -LRB104 15203 RTM 28349 b1may appoint advisors from the public safety communications 2community to serve on any subcommittees at the pleasure of the 3SIEC. The Illinois State Police shall provide administrative 4and other support to the SIEC and any duly created 5subcommittees STARCOM21 Oversight Committee.6     (c) The SIEC STARCOM21 Oversight Committee shall:7        (1) no later than July 1, 2027, establish:8            (A) standards necessary to ensure land mobile 9        radio equipment interoperates throughout Illinois;10            (B) planning, training, and evaluation standards 11        necessary to enhance public safety communications 12        operational readiness; and13            (C) standards necessary for the unification of the 14        Integrated Public Alert and Warning System statewide 15        review existing statutory law and make recommendations 16        for legislative changes to ensure efficient, 17        effective, reliable, and sustainable radio 18        interoperability statewide;19        (2) (blank) make recommendations concerning better 20    integration of the Integrated Public Alert and Warning 21    System statewide; and22        (3) annually review existing statutory law and make 23    recommendations for legislative changes to ensure 24    efficient, effective, reliable, and sustainable 25    communications interoperability statewide develop a plan 26    to sustainably fund radio infrastructure, radio equipment,   SB2946- 4 -LRB104 15203 RTM 28349 b1    and interoperability statewide.2    The SIEC shall have at a minimum one representative from 3each of the following: the Illinois Fire Chiefs Association, 4the Rural Fire Protection Association, the Office of the State 5Fire Marshal, the Illinois Association of Chiefs of Police, 6the Illinois Sheriffs' Association, the Illinois State Police, 7the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, the Department of 8Public Health, and the Secretary of State Police (which 9representative shall be the Director of the Secretary of State 10Police or his or her designee).11(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.